Washington statutes.
RCW 2.48.150

Admission fees.

Applicants for admission to the bar upon accredited certificates or upon examination, not having been admitted to the bar in another state or territory, shall pay a fee of twenty-five dollars and all other applicants a fee of fifty dollars. Said admission fees shall be used to pay the expenses incurred in connection with examining and admitting applicants to the bar, including salaries of examiners, and any balance remaining at the close of each biennium shall be paid to the state treasurer and be by him or her credited to the general fund.

[ 2011 c 336 s 65; 1933 c 94 s 11; RRS s 138-11.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Admission—APR 3(d).